Utah statutes.
58-13-3.   Qualified immunity -- Health professionals -- Charity care.
(1) (a) (i)  The Legislature finds many residents of this state do not receive
medical care and preventive health care because they lack health insurance or
because of financial difficulties or cost.
(ii)  The Legislature also finds that many physicians, charity health care
facilities, and other health care professionals in this state would be willing
to volunteer medical and allied services without compensation if they were not
subject to the high exposure of liability connected with providing these
services.
(b)  The Legislature therefore declares that its intention in enacting this
section is to encourage the provision of uncompensated volunteer charity
health care in exchange for a limitation on liability for the health care
facilities and health care professionals who provide those volunteer services.
(2)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Health care facility" means any clinic or hospital, church, or
organization whose primary purpose is to sponsor, promote, or organize
uncompensated health care services for people unable to pay for health care
services.
(b)  "Health care professional" means a person licensed under:
(i)  Chapter 5a, Podiatric Physician Licensing Act;
(ii)  Chapter 16a, Utah Optometry Practice Act;
(iii)  Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act;
(iv)  Chapter 24b, Physical Therapist Practice Act;
(v)  Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;
(vi)  Chapter 40, Recreational Therapist Practice Act;
(vii)  Chapter 41, Speech-language Pathology and Audiology Licensing Act;
(viii)  Chapter 42a, Occupational Therapy Practice Act;
(ix)  Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act;
(x)  Chapter 49, Dietitian Certification Act;
(xi)  Chapter 60, Mental Health Professional Practice Act;
(xii)  Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;
(xiii)  Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;
(xiv)  Chapter 69, Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice Act;
(xv)  Chapter 70a, Physician Assistant Act; and
(xvi)  Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act.
(c)  "Remuneration or compensation":
(i) (A)  means direct or indirect receipt of any payment by a health care
professional or health care facility on behalf of the patient, including
payment or reimbursement under medicare or medicaid, or under the state
program for the medically indigent on behalf of the patient; and
(B)  compensation, salary, or reimbursement to the health care professional
from any source for the health care professional's services or time in
volunteering to provide uncompensated health care; and
(ii)  does not mean:
(A)  any grant or donation to the health care facility used to offset direct
costs associated with providing the uncompensated health care such as:
(I)  medical supplies;
(II)  drugs; or
(III)  a charitable donation that is restricted for charitable services at the
health care facility; or
(B)  incidental reimbursements to the volunteer such as:
(I)  food supplied to the volunteer;
(II)  clothing supplied to the volunteer to help identify the volunteer during
the time of volunteer services;
(III)  mileage reimbursement to the volunteer; or
(IV)  other similar support to the volunteer.
(3)  A health care professional who provides health care treatment at or on
behalf of a health care facility is not liable in a medical malpractice action
if:
(a)  the treatment was within the scope of the health care professional's
license under this title;
(b)  neither the health care professional nor the health care facility
received compensation or remuneration for the treatment;
(c)  the acts or omissions of the health care professional were not grossly
negligent or willful and wanton; and
(d)  prior to rendering services, the health care professional disclosed in
writing to the patient, or if a minor, to the patient's parent or legal
guardian, that the health care professional is providing the services without
receiving remuneration or compensation and that in exchange for receiving
uncompensated health care, the patient consents to waive any right to sue for
professional negligence except for acts or omissions which are grossly
negligent or are willful and wanton.
(4)  A health care facility which sponsors, promotes, or organizes the
uncompensated care  is not liable in a medical malpractice action for acts and
omissions if:
(a)  the health care facility meets the requirements in Subsection (3)(b);
(b)  the acts and omissions of the health care facility were not grossly
negligent or willful and wanton; and
(c)  the health care facility has posted, in a conspicuous place, a notice
that in accordance with this section the health care facility is not liable
for any civil damages for acts or omissions except for those acts or omissions
that are grossly negligent or are willful and wanton.
(5)  Immunity from liability under this section does not extend to the use of
general anesthesia or care that requires an overnight stay in a general acute
or specialty hospital licensed under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care
Facility Licensing and Inspection Act.
